Oklahoma, session 2025, SB844.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 302 of Title 60, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Safeguarding
Endowment Gifts Act”.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 302.1 of Title 60, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
As used in this act:
1. “Charitable organization” means an organization organized
and operated exclusively for religious, charitable, scientific,
literary, educational, or other specified purposes or for testing
for public safety and that is tax exempt from federal income tax as

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB844 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

an e ntity described in the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as
amended, Section 501(c)(3);
2. “Charitable trust” means a trust made for the benefit of a
specific charitable purpose;
3. “Donor” means an individual or entity who has made a
contribution of property or money to either an existing endowment
fund or a new endowment fund of a charitable organization or of a
charitable trust pursuant to the terms of an endowment agreement
that may include donor-imposed restrictions or conditions governing
the use of the contribution;
4. “Donor-imposed restriction” means a written statement within
an endowment agreement that specifies obligations on the management
or purpose of the endowment fund;
5. “Endowment agreement” means a written agreement between a
charitable organization and a donor or between a charitable trust
and a donor regarding the contribution made by the donor and
accepted by the charitable organization or the charitable trust,
which may include donor-imposed restrictions or other conditions
governing the use of the contribution;
6. “Endowment fund” means an institutional fund or part thereof
that, under the terms of a gift instrument, is not wholly expendable
by the institution on a current basis. The term does not mean
assets that an institution designates as an endowment fund for its
own use;
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB844 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

7. “Gift instrument” means a record or records, including an
institutional solicitation, under which property is granted to,
transferred to, or held by an institution as an institutional fund;
8. “Legal representative” means the administrator or executor
of a person’s estate, a surviving spouse if a court judgment has
settled the accounts of the estate, or a person designated in an
endowment agreement, whether or not born at the time of such
designation, to act in place of a party to the agreement for all
matters expressed in the agreement and all of the actions it
contemplates, including, without limitation, interpreting,
performing, enforcing, and defending the validity of the agreement;
and
9. “Property” means real property, personal property or money,
digital assets, stocks, bonds, or any other asset or financial
instrument.
SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 302.2 of Title 60, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Unless otherwise specified by federal or state law, no
charitable organization that accepts a contribution pursuant to a
written donor-imposed restriction may violate the terms of that
restriction without penalty.
B. If a charitable organization violates a donor-imposed
restriction contained in an endowment agreement, the donor, or that
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB844 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

pers on’s legal representative, ninety (90) days after notification
to the charitable organization, may file a complaint within six (6)
years after discovery for breach of such agreement. The complaint
may be filed in a court of general jurisdiction in the county where
a charitable organization named as a party has its principal place
of business for carrying out its charitable activities, or in a
court of the United States whose district includes such county. The
complaint may be filed regardless of whether the agreement expressly
reserves a right to use or enforce and it shall not seek a judgment
awarding damages to the plaintiff.
C. In the event a charitable organization is unable to fulfill
a term of an endowment agreement, the donor or donor’s legal
representative shall be notified within thirty (30) days in advance
and offered an alternative solution that closely matches the initial
term in the endowment agreement.
D. A charitable organization may obtain a judicial declaration
of rights and duties expressed in an endowment agreement containing
donor restrictions as to all of the actions the agreement
contemplates, including, without limitation, the interpretation,
performance, and enforcement of the agreement and determination of
its validity. The charitable organization shall seek such
declaration in any suit brought under this section or by filing a
complaint.

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB844 SFLR Page 4
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

E. If the court determines that a charitable organization
violated a donor-imposed restriction in an endowment agreement, the
court may order one or more remedies consistent with the charitable
purposes expressed in the endowment agreement. The court shall not
order the return of donated funds to the donor or the donor’s legal
representative.
F. Nothing in this act shall affect the authority of the Office
of the Attorney General to enforce any restriction in an endowment
agreement, limit the application of the judicial power of cy pres,
or alter the right of an institution to modify a restriction on the
management, investment, purpose, or use of an endowment fund in a
manner permitted by the endowment agreement, by the Uniform Prudent
Management of Institutional Funds Act, or by the Oklahoma Charitable
Fiduciary Act.
SECTION 4. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON RETIREMENT AND GOVERNMENT
RESOURCES
March 4, 2025 - DO PASS AS AMENDED







SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB844 SFLR Page 5
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)